District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.38

Duration of suspension.

The suspension or revocation hereinbefore required shall remain in effect and the Mayor shall not issue to such person any new or renewal of license or register or reregister in the name of such person as owner of any such vehicle until permitted under the motor vehicle laws of the District of Columbia and not then unless and until such person shall give and thereafter maintain proof of financial responsibility for the future.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 131, ch. 222, § 38
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 40-454.
1981 Ed., § 40-438.